Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1328
Record on appeal.

The verbatim testimony transcribed by the official stenographer, including all exhibits received, shall constitute the bill of exceptions. The decision appealed and the bill of exceptions duly certified by the members of the arbitration board shall constitute the complete record on appeal.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 28;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 127.